Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Department of State Police shall study the causes  of and ways to
address the shortage of medical examiners within this state. The results of the study  must
include:
(a) A plan to  strengthen, supplement and make operational the recommendations from
the Medical Examiner Improvement in Oregon work group;
(b) A determination  of how to ensure that counties are provided with stabilized and
sustainable funding for medical examiner  services that ORS chapter 146 requires counties
to provide;
(c) An  analysis of the development of new forensic pathology slots through the Oregon
Health and Science University;
(d) A determination of how to ensure that Oregon  is following best national and regional
practices in a timely manner, including an analysis of laws and legislation from other states;
(e) An analysis of the  potential utilization of the Conrad 30 waiver program for J-1 for-
eign medical graduates; and
(f) A determination of how to best meet regional  medical examiner needs across this
state.
(2) In conducting the study described in subsection (1) of this section, the department:
(a) Shall consult with all counties  to ensure that any plan developed pursuant to the
study does not interfere with a well-functioning medical examiner  program that currently
exists within any county;
(b) Shall consult with district attorneys, public health providers, the Oregon Association
Chiefs of Police, the Oregon State Sheriffs’ Association, medical-legal  death investigators,
national medical examiner accrediting organizations and federally recognized tribal govern-
ments within this  state and at least one member of the public who has been affected by the
medical examiner shortage;
(c) Shall consult with the Oregon Health Authority  concerning the potential utilization
of the Conrad 30 waiver program and any other part of the study the  department determines
to be appropriate; and
(d) Shall consult with  members of the Legislative Assembly serving on the interim com-
mittees of  the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary and health care and members
Enrolled House Bill 4003 (HB 4003-B) Page 1
of the Legislative Assembly serving on the interim subcommittee of  the Joint Committee on
Ways and Means related to public safety.
(3) No later than October 1, 2024, the department shall provide  the results of the study,
including any recommended legislative changes, in  a report to the appropriate interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided under ORS 192.245.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 2, 2025.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 14, 2024
Repassed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 28, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4003 (HB 4003-B) Page 2